District of Columbia statutes.
29-1001.11

Business transactions of member with limited cooperative association.

Subject to §§ 29-1008.18 and 29-1008.19 and except as otherwise provided in the organic rules or a specific contract relating to a transaction, a member may lend money to and do other business with a limited cooperative association in the same manner as a person that is not a member.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-1001.09.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 115 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.